Massachusetts, session 194th, H4495.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 176O of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 31. (a) In this section “340B covered entity” means an entity participating in the
federal 340B drug discount program, as described in 42 U.S.C. § 256b, including its pharmacy or
pharmacies, or any pharmacy or pharmacies, contracted with the participating entity to dispense
drugs purchased through such program. (b) A pharmacy benefit manager or other third party that
reimburses a 340B covered entity for drugs shall not:
(1) reimburse the 340B covered entity for a drug at a rate lower than that paid for the
same drug to entities that are not 340B covered entities; (2) assess any fee, charge-back, or other
adjustment on the 340B covered entity on the basis that the covered entity participates in the
340B program; (3) restrict participation in a pharmacy or provider network based on an entity’s
status as a 340B covered entity; (4) require the 340B covered entity to enter into a contract with a
specific pharmacy to participate in the pharmacy benefit manager or third party’s pharmacy or
of 2

provider network; (5) require a claim for a drug to include a modifier, supplemental
transmission, to indicate that the drug is a 340B drug, or any other method of identifying the
claim for a 340B drug, unless the claim is for payment, directly or indirectly, by Medicaid; or (6)
impose coverage or benefits limitations, or require an enrollee to pay an additional fee, higher
copay, higher coinsurance, second copay, second coinsurance, or other penalty when obtaining a
drug from a 340 covered entity; (7) interfere with the patient's right to choose to obtain a drug
from a 340B covered entity, including inducement, steering, or offering financial or other
incentives.
of 2